Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2612
Act; applications; limitation.

The board shall not accept applications for assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act after December 31, 2030.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB551, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB402, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 23.